Utah statutes.
13-15-6.   Failure to file disclosures -- Relief where seller fails to
comply with chapter -- Relief where division granted judgment or injunction --
Administrative fines.
(1)  If a seller fails to file the disclosures required under Section 13-15-4,
or fails after demand by the division to file the disclosure within 15 days,
the division, consistent with Section 13-2-5, shall begin adjudicative
proceedings and shall issue a cease and desist order.
(2)  Any purchaser of a business opportunity from a seller who does not comply
with this chapter is entitled, in an appropriate court of competent
jurisdiction, to rescission of the contract, to an award of a reasonable
attorney's fee and costs of court in an action to enforce the right of
rescission, and to the amount of actual damages or $2,000, whichever is
greater.
(3)  In the event the division is granted judgment or injunctive relief in an
appropriate court of competent jurisdiction, the division, in addition to any
other relief, is entitled to an award of reasonable attorney's fees, costs of
court, and investigative fees.
(4) (a)  In addition to other penalties under this chapter, and to its other
enforcement powers under Title 13, Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection,
the division director may impose an administrative fine of up to $2,500 for
each violation of this chapter.
(b)  All money received through administrative fines imposed under this
section shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education and Training
Fund created by Section 13-2-8.
